Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-234
Constitutional convention; delegates; preliminary survey committee; compensation; expenses; payment.

The compensation and mileage of the members of the constitutional convention, provided for by section 49-230, shall be paid by warrant on the State Treasurer, upon vouchers duly certified by the presiding officer of the convention. The expenses of the preliminary survey committee, provided for by section 49-233, shall be paid in the same manner upon the certificate of the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court.

Laws 1953, c. 173, § 23, p. 554.